Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.193.080

Allocation of money—Accountability requirements—Rules.

The superintendent of public instruction shall:

(1) Allocate money appropriated by the legislature to administer and provide education programs under this chapter to school districts, educational service districts, and other education providers selected under RCW 28A.193.020 that have assumed the primary responsibility to administer and provide education programs under this chapter. The allocation of moneys to any private contractor is contingent upon and must be in accordance with a contract between the private contractor and the department of corrections; and

(2) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW that establish reporting, program compliance, audit, and such other accountability requirements as are reasonably necessary to implement this chapter and related provisions of the biennial operating act effectively.

[ 1998 c 244 s 9.]